Ohio, session 136, SB125.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 715.27, 3781.102, 4740.01, 5
4740.02, 4740.04, 4740.12, 4740.13, and 4764.03 of the Revised 6
Code be amended to read as follows: 7
Sec. 715.27. (A) Any municipal corporation may: 8
(1) Regulate the erection of fences, billboards, signs, 9
and other structures, within the municipal corporation, and 10
provide for the removal and repair of insecure billboards, 11
signs, and other structures; 12
(2) Regulate the construction and repair of wires, poles, 13
plants, and all equipment to be used for the generation and 14
application of electricity; 15
(3) Provide for the licensing of house movers; plumbers; 16
sewer tappers; vault cleaners; and specialty contractors who are 17
not required to hold a valid license issued pursuant to Chapter 18

S. B. No. 125 Page 2
As Introduced
4740. of the Revised Code; 19
(4) Require all specialty contractors other than those who 20
hold a valid license issued pursuant to Chapter 4740. of the 21
Revised Code, to successfully complete an examination, test, or 22
demonstration of technical skills, and may impose a fee and 23
additional requirements for a license or registration to engage 24
in their respective occupations within the jurisdiction of the 25
municipal corporation. 26
(B) No municipal corporation shall require any specialty 27
contractor who holds a valid license issued pursuant to Chapter 28
4740. of the Revised Code to complete an examination, test, or 29
demonstration of technical skills to engage in the type of 30
contracting for which the license is held, within the municipal 31
corporation. 32
(C) A municipal corporation may require a specialty 33
contractor who holds a valid license issued pursuant to Chapter 34
4740. of the Revised Code to register with the municipal 35
corporation and pay any fee the municipal corporation imposes 36
before that specialty contractor may engage within the municipal 37
corporation in the type of contracting for which the license is 38
held. Any fee shall be the same for all specialty contractors 39
who engage in the same type of contracting. A municipal 40
corporation may require a bond and proof of all of the 41
following: 42
(1) Insurance pursuant to division (B)(4) of section 43
4740.06 of the Revised Code; 44
(2) Compliance with Chapters 4121. and 4123. of the 45
Revised Code; 46
(3) Registration with the tax department of the municipal 47

S. B. No. 125 Page 3
As Introduced
corporation. 48
If a municipal corporation requires registration, imposes 49
such a fee, or requires a bond or proof of the items listed in 50
divisions (C)(1), (2), and (3) of this section, the municipal 51
corporation immediately shall permit a contractor who presents 52
proof of holding a valid license issued pursuant to Chapter 53
4740. of the Revised Code, who registers, pays the fee, obtains 54
a bond, and submits the proof described under divisions (C)(1), 55
(2), and (3) of this section, as required, to engage in the type 56
of contracting for which the license is held, within the 57
municipal corporation. 58
(D) A municipal corporation may revoke the registration of 59
a contractor registered with that municipal corporation for good 60
cause shown. Good cause shown includes the failure of a 61
contractor to maintain a bond or the items listed in divisions 62
(C)(1), (2), and (3) of this section, if the municipal 63
corporation requires those. 64
(E) A municipal corporation that licenses specialty 65
contractors pursuant to division (A)(3) of this section may 66
accept, for purposes of satisfying its licensing requirements, a 67
valid license issued pursuant to Chapter 4740. of the Revised 68
Code that a specialty contractor holds, for the construction, 69
replacement, maintenance, or repair of one-family, two-family, 70
or three-family dwelling houses or accessory structures 71
incidental to those dwelling houses. 72
(F) A municipal corporation shall not register a specialty 73
contractor who is required to hold a license under Chapter 4740. 74
of the Revised Code but does not hold a valid license issued 75
under that chapter. 76

S. B. No. 125 Page 4
As Introduced
(G) If a municipal corporation regulates a profession, 77
occupation, or occupational activity under this section, the 78
municipal corporation shall comply with Chapter 4796. of the 79
Revised Code. 80
(H) As used in this section, "specialty contractor" means 81
a heating, ventilating, and air conditioning contractor, 82
refrigeration contractor, electrical contractor, plumbing 83
contractor, or hydronics contractor, or roofing contractor, as 84
those contractors are described in Chapter 4740. of the Revised 85
Code. 86
Sec. 3781.102. (A) Any county or municipal building 87
department certified pursuant to division (E) of section 3781.10 88
of the Revised Code as of September 14, 1970, and that, as of 89
that date, was inspecting single-family, two-family, and three- 90
family residences, and any township building department 91
certified pursuant to division (E) of section 3781.10 of the 92
Revised Code, is hereby declared to be certified to inspect 93
single-family, two-family, and three-family residences 94
containing industrialized units, and shall inspect the buildings 95
or classes of buildings subject to division (E) of section 96
3781.10 of the Revised Code. 97
(B) Each board of county commissioners may adopt, by 98
resolution, rules establishing standards and providing for the 99
licensing of electrical and heating, ventilating, and air 100
conditioning contractors who are not required to hold a valid 101
and unexpired license pursuant to Chapter 4740. of the Revised 102
Code. 103
Rules adopted by a board of county commissioners pursuant 104
to this division may be enforced within the unincorporated areas 105
of the county and within any municipal corporation where the 106

S. B. No. 125 Page 5
As Introduced
legislative authority of the municipal corporation has 107
contracted with the board for the enforcement of the county 108
rules within the municipal corporation pursuant to section 109
307.15 of the Revised Code. The rules shall not conflict with 110
rules adopted by the board of building standards pursuant to 111
section 3781.10 of the Revised Code or by the department of 112
commerce pursuant to Chapter 3703. of the Revised Code. This 113
division does not impair or restrict the power of municipal 114
corporations under Section 3 of Article XVIII, Ohio 115
Constitution, to adopt rules concerning the erection, 116
construction, repair, alteration, and maintenance of buildings 117
and structures or of establishing standards and providing for 118
the licensing of specialty contractors pursuant to section 119
715.27 of the Revised Code. 120
A board of county commissioners, pursuant to this 121
division, may require all electrical contractors and heating, 122
ventilating, and air conditioning contractors, other than those 123
who hold a valid and unexpired license issued pursuant to 124
Chapter 4740. of the Revised Code, to successfully complete an 125
examination, test, or demonstration of technical skills, and may 126
impose a fee and additional requirements for a license to engage 127
in their respective occupations within the jurisdiction of the 128
board's rules under this division. 129
(C) No board of county commissioners shall require any 130
specialty contractor who holds a valid and unexpired license 131
issued pursuant to Chapter 4740. of the Revised Code to 132
successfully complete an examination, test, or demonstration of 133
technical skills in order to engage in the type of contracting 134
for which the license is held, within the unincorporated areas 135
of the county and within any municipal corporation whose 136
legislative authority has contracted with the board for the 137

S. B. No. 125 Page 6
As Introduced
enforcement of county regulations within the municipal 138
corporation, pursuant to section 307.15 of the Revised Code. 139
(D) A board may impose a fee for registration of a 140
specialty contractor who holds a valid and unexpired license 141
issued pursuant to Chapter 4740. of the Revised Code before that 142
specialty contractor may engage in the type of contracting for 143
which the license is held within the unincorporated areas of the 144
county and within any municipal corporation whose legislative 145
authority has contracted with the board for the enforcement of 146
county regulations within the municipal corporation, pursuant to 147
section 307.15 of the Revised Code, provided that the fee is the 148
same for all specialty contractors who wish to engage in that 149
type of contracting. If a board imposes such a fee, the board 150
immediately shall permit a specialty contractor who presents 151
proof of holding a valid and unexpired license and pays the 152
required fee to engage in the type of contracting for which the 153
license is held within the unincorporated areas of the county 154
and within any municipal corporation whose legislative authority 155
has contracted with the board for the enforcement of county 156
regulations within the municipal corporation, pursuant to 157
section 307.15 of the Revised Code. 158
(E) The political subdivision associated with each 159
municipal, township, and county building department the board of 160
building standards certifies pursuant to division (E) of section 161
3781.10 of the Revised Code may prescribe fees to be paid by 162
persons, political subdivisions, or any department, agency, 163
board, commission, or institution of the state, for the 164
acceptance and approval of plans and specifications, and for the 165
making of inspections, pursuant to sections 3781.03 and 3791.04 166
of the Revised Code. 167

S. B. No. 125 Page 7
As Introduced
(F) Each political subdivision that prescribes fees 168
pursuant to division (E) of this section shall collect, on 169
behalf of the board of building standards, fees equal to the 170
following: 171
(1) Three per cent of the fees the political subdivision 172
collects in connection with nonresidential buildings; 173
(2) One per cent of the fees the political subdivision 174
collects in connection with residential buildings. 175
(G)(1) The board shall adopt rules, in accordance with 176
Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, specifying the manner in which 177
the fee assessed pursuant to division (F) of this section shall 178
be collected and remitted monthly to the board. The board shall 179
pay the fees into the state treasury to the credit of the 180
industrial compliance operating fund created in section 121.084 181
of the Revised Code. 182
(2) All money credited to the industrial compliance 183
operating fund under this division shall be used exclusively for 184
the following: 185
(a) Operating costs of the board; 186
(b) Providing services, including educational programs, 187
for the building departments that are certified by the board 188
pursuant to division (E) of section 3781.10 of the Revised Code; 189
(c) Paying the expenses of the residential construction 190
advisory committee, including the expenses of committee members 191
as provided in section 4740.14 of the Revised Code. 192
(H) A board of county commissioners that adopts rules 193
providing for the licensing of electrical and heating, 194
ventilating, and air conditioning contractors, pursuant to 195

S. B. No. 125 Page 8
As Introduced
division (B) of this section, may accept, for purposes of 196
satisfying the requirements of rules adopted under that 197
division, a valid and unexpired license issued pursuant to 198
Chapter 4740. of the Revised Code that is held by an electrical 199
or heating, ventilating, and air conditioning contractor, for 200
the construction, replacement, maintenance, or repair of one- 201
family, two-family, or three-family dwelling houses or accessory 202
structures incidental to those dwelling houses. 203
(I) A board of county commissioners shall not register a 204
specialty contractor who is required to hold a license under 205
Chapter 4740. of the Revised Code but does not hold a valid 206
license issued under that chapter. 207
(J) If a board of county commissioners regulates a 208
profession, occupation, or occupational activity under this 209
section, the board shall comply with Chapter 4796. of the 210
Revised Code. 211
(K) As used in this section, "specialty contractor" means 212
a heating, ventilating, and air conditioning contractor, 213
refrigeration contractor, electrical contractor, plumbing 214
contractor, or hydronics contractor, or roofing contractor, as 215
those contractors are described in Chapter 4740. of the Revised 216
Code. 217
Sec. 4740.01. As used in this chapter: 218
(A) "License" means a license the Ohio construction 219
industry licensing board issues to an individual as a heating, 220
ventilating, and air conditioning contractor, refrigeration 221
contractor, electrical contractor, plumbing contractor, or 222
hydronics contractor, or roofing contractor. 223
(B) "Contractor" means any individual or contracting 224

S. B. No. 125 Page 9
As Introduced
company that satisfies both of the following: 225
(1) Has responsibility for the means, method, and manner 226
of construction, improvement, renovation, repair, or maintenance 227
on a construction project with respect to one or more trades and 228
who offers, identifies, advertises, or otherwise holds out or 229
represents that the individual or contracting company is 230
permitted or qualified to perform or have responsibility for the 231
means, method, and manner of construction, improvement, 232
renovation, repair, or maintenance with respect to one or more 233
trades on a construction project; 234
(2) Does either of the following: 235
(a) Performs construction, improvement, or renovation on a 236
construction project with respect to the individual's or 237
contracting company's trade; 238
(b) Employs tradespersons who perform construction, 239
improvement, or renovation on a construction project with 240
respect to the individual's or contracting company's trades. 241
(C) "Contracting company" means a company in the 242
construction industry working on construction projects. 243
(D) "Licensed trade" means a trade performed by a heating, 244
ventilating, and air conditioning contractor, a refrigeration 245
contractor, an electrical contractor, a plumbing contractor, or 246
a hydronics contractor, or a roofing contractor. 247
(E) "Tradesperson" means any individual who is employed by 248
a contractor and who engages in construction, improvement, 249
renovation, repair, or maintenance of buildings or structures 250
without assuming responsibility for the means, method, or manner 251
of that construction, improvement, renovation, repair, or 252
maintenance. 253

S. B. No. 125 Page 10
As Introduced
(F) "Construction project" means a construction project 254
involving a building or structure subject to Chapter 3781. of 255
the Revised Code and the rules adopted under that chapter, but 256
not an industrialized unit or a residential building as defined 257
in section 3781.06 of the Revised Code. 258
(G) "Training agency" means an entity approved by the 259
administrative section of the board to provide continuing 260
education courses. 261
Sec. 4740.02. (A) There is hereby created within the 262
department of commerce, the Ohio construction industry licensing 263
board, consisting of seventeen twenty-two residents of this 264
state. The board shall have an administrative section and three 265
four specialty sections: a plumbing and hydronics section, an 266
electrical section, and a heating, ventilating, air 267
conditioning, and refrigeration section, and a roofing section. 268
The director of commerce shall appoint all members of the board. 269
The director or the director's designee shall serve as a member 270
of the administrative section and the director shall appoint to 271
the section to represent the public, one member who is not a 272
member of any group certified by any section of the board. Each 273
section, other than the administrative section, shall annually 274
elect a member of its section to serve a one-year term on the 275
administrative section. 276
(B) The plumbing and hydronics section consists of five 277
members, one of whom is a plumbing inspector employed by the 278
department of commerce, a municipal corporation, or a health 279
district, two of whom are plumbing contractors who have no 280
affiliation with any union representing plumbers, and two of 281
whom are plumbing contractors who are signatories to agreements 282
with unions representing plumbers. 283

S. B. No. 125 Page 11
As Introduced
The plumbing and hydronics section has primary 284
responsibility for the licensure of plumbing contractors and 285
hydronics contractors. 286
(C) The electrical section consists of five members, one 287
of whom is an electrical inspector employed by the department of 288
commerce, a municipal corporation, or a county, two of whom are 289
electrical contractors who have no affiliation with any union 290
representing electricians, and two of whom are electrical 291
contractors who are signatories to agreements with unions 292
representing electricians. 293
The electrical section has primary responsibility for the 294
licensure of electrical contractors. 295
(D) The heating, ventilating, air conditioning, and 296
refrigeration section consists of five members, one of whom is a 297
heating, ventilating, air conditioning, and refrigeration 298
inspector employed by either the department of commerce or a 299
municipal corporation; two of whom are heating, ventilating, and 300
air conditioning contractors or refrigeration contractors who 301
have no affiliation with any union representing heating, 302
ventilating, and air conditioning tradespersons or refrigeration 303
tradespersons; and two of whom are heating, ventilating, and air 304
conditioning contractors or refrigeration contractors who are 305
signatories to agreements with unions representing heating, 306
ventilating, and air conditioning tradespersons or refrigeration 307
tradespersons. 308
The heating, ventilating, air conditioning, and 309
refrigeration section has primary responsibility for the 310
licensure of heating, ventilating, and air conditioning 311
contractors and refrigeration contractors. 312

S. B. No. 125 Page 12
As Introduced
(E) The roofing section consists of five members, one of 313
whom is a building inspector employed by the department of 314
commerce or a municipal corporation, two of whom are roofing 315
contractors who have no affiliation with any union representing 316
roofers, and two of whom are roofing contractors who are 317
signatories to agreements with unions representing roofers. The 318
roofing section has primary responsibility for the licensure of 319
roofing contractors. 320
(F)(1) Within ninety days after July 31, 1992, initial 321
appointments shall be made to the board. Of the initial 322
appointments to the board, two appointments in each section, 323
other than the administrative section, are for terms ending one 324
year after July 31, 1992, and two are for terms ending two years 325
after July 31, 1992. All other appointments to the board are for 326
terms ending three years after July 31, 1992. 327
Within ninety days after the effective date of this 328
amendment, initial appointments shall be made to the roofing 329
section of the board. Two initial appointments in the section 330
shall be for terms ending one year after the effective date of 331
this amendment, two initial appointments shall be for terms 332
ending two years after the effective date of this amendment, and 333
the remaining initial appointment shall be for a term ending 334
three years after the effective date of this amendment. 335
(2) Thereafter, terms of office are for three years, each 336
term ending on the same day of the same month of the year as did 337
the term that it succeeds. Each member shall hold office from 338
the date of appointment until the end of the term for which the 339
member was appointed. Members may be reappointed. Vacancies 340
shall be filled in the manner provided for original 341
appointments. Any member appointed to fill a vacancy occurring 342

S. B. No. 125 Page 13
As Introduced
prior to the expiration of the term for which the member's 343
predecessor was appointed shall hold office as a member for the 344
remainder of that term. A member shall continue in office 345
subsequent to the expiration of a term until a successor takes 346
office or until a period of sixty days has elapsed, whichever 347
occurs first. 348
(F) (G) Before entering upon the discharge of official 349
duties, each member shall take the oath of office required by 350
Section 7 of Article XV, Ohio Constitution. 351
(G) (H) Each member, except for the director or the 352
director's designee, shall receive a per diem amount fixed 353
pursuant to section 124.15 of the Revised Code when actually 354
attending to matters of the board and for the time spent in 355
necessary travel, and all actual and necessary expenses incurred 356
in the discharge of official duties. 357
(H) (I) The director of commerce may remove any member of 358
the board the director appoints for malfeasance, misfeasance, or 359
nonfeasance. 360
(I) (J) Membership on the board and holding any office of 361
the board does not constitute holding a public office or 362
employment within the meaning of any section of the Revised 363
Code, or an interest, either direct or indirect, in a contract 364
or expenditure of money by the state or any municipal 365
corporation, township, special district, school district, 366
county, or other political subdivision. No member or officer of 367
the board is disqualified from holding any public office or 368
employment nor shall the officer or member forfeit any public 369
office or employment by reason of holding a position as an 370
officer or member of the board. 371

S. B. No. 125 Page 14
As Introduced
(J) (K) The board, and each section of the board, shall 372
meet only after adequate advance notice of the meeting has been 373
given to each member of the board or section, as appropriate. 374
Sec. 4740.04. The administrative section of the Ohio 375
construction industry licensing board is responsible for the 376
administration of this chapter and shall do all of the 377
following: 378
(A) Schedule the contractor examinations each of the other 379
sections of the board directs. Each type of examination shall be 380
held at least four times per year. 381
(B) Select and contract with one or more persons to do all 382
of the following relative to the examinations: 383
(1) Prepare, administer, score, and maintain the 384
confidentiality of the examinations; 385
(2) Be responsible for all the expenses required to 386
fulfill division (B)(1) of this section; 387
(3) Charge an applicant a fee in an amount the 388
administrative section of the board authorizes for administering 389
the examination. 390
(C) Issue and renew licenses as follows: 391
(1) Issue a license to any individual who the appropriate 392
specialty section of the board determines is qualified pursuant 393
to section 4740.06 of the Revised Code to hold a license and has 394
attained, within the twelve months preceding the individual's 395
application for licensure, a score on the examination that the 396
appropriate specialty section authorizes for the licensed trade. 397
(a) Each license shall include the contractor's name, 398
license number, expiration date, and the name of the contracting 399

S. B. No. 125 Page 15
As Introduced
company associated with the individual, as applicable. 400
(b) Each license issued to an individual who holds more 401
than one valid license shall contain the same license number and 402
expiration date as the original license issued to that 403
individual. 404
(2) Renew licenses for individuals who meet the renewal 405
requirements of section 4740.06 of the Revised Code. 406
(D) Make an annual written report to the director of 407
commerce on proceedings had by or before the board for the 408
previous year and make an annual statement of all money received 409
and expended by the board during the year; 410
(E) Keep a record containing the name, address, the date 411
on which the board issues or renews a license to, and the 412
license number of, every heating, ventilating, and air 413
conditioning contractor, refrigeration contractor, electrical 414
contractor, plumbing contractor, and hydronics contractor, and 415
roofing contractor issued a license pursuant to this chapter; 416
(F) Regulate a contractor's use and display of a license 417
issued pursuant to this chapter and of any information contained 418
in that license; 419
(G) Adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the 420
Revised Code as necessary to properly discharge the 421
administrative section's duties under this chapter. The rules 422
shall include, but not be limited to, the following: 423
(1) Application procedures for examinations; 424
(2) Specifications for continuing education requirements 425
for license renewal that address all of the following: 426
(a) A requirement that an individual who holds any number 427

S. B. No. 125 Page 16
As Introduced
of valid and unexpired licenses accrue a total of ten hours of 428
continuing education courses per year; 429
(b) Fees the board charges to persons who provide 430
continuing education courses, in an amount of twenty-five 431
dollars annually for each person approved to provide courses, 432
not more than ten dollars plus one dollar per credit hour for 433
each course submitted to a specialty section of the board for 434
approval according to division (F) of section 4740.05 of the 435
Revised Code, and one dollar per credit hour of instruction per 436
attendee; 437
(c) A provision limiting approval of continuing education 438
courses to one year. 439
(3) Requirements for criminal records checks of applicants 440
under section 4776.03 of the Revised Code. 441
(H) Adopt any continuing education curriculum as the other 442
sections of the board establish or approve pursuant to division 443
(F) of section 4740.05 of the Revised Code; 444
(I) Keep a record of its proceedings and do all things 445
necessary to carry out this chapter. 446
Sec. 4740.12. (A) No political subdivision, district, or 447
agency of the state may adopt an ordinance or rule that requires 448
contractor registration and the assessment of a registration or 449
license fee unless that ordinance or rule also requires any 450
contractor who registers and pays the registration or license 451
fee to be licensed in the contractor's trade pursuant to this 452
chapter. 453
(B) Except as provided in division (A) of this section, 454
nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit the 455
operation of any statute or rule of this state or any ordinance 456

S. B. No. 125 Page 17
As Introduced
or rule of any political subdivision, district, or agency of the 457
state that does either of the following: 458
(1) Regulates the installation, repair, maintenance, or 459
alteration of plumbing systems, hydronics systems, electrical 460
systems, heating, ventilating, and air conditioning systems, or 461
refrigeration systems, or roofing systems; 462
(2) Requires the registration and assessment of a 463
registration or license fee of tradespersons who perform 464
heating, ventilating, and air conditioning, refrigeration, 465
electrical, plumbing, or hydronics, or roofing construction, 466
improvement, renovation, repair, or maintenance. 467
Sec. 4740.13. (A) No Except as provided in division (E) of 468
this section, no person shall act as or claim to be a type of 469
contractor that this chapter licenses unless that person holds 470
or has been assigned a license issued pursuant to this chapter 471
for the type of contractor that person is acting as or claiming 472
to be. 473
(B) Upon the request of the appropriate specialty section 474
of the Ohio construction industry licensing board, the attorney 475
general may bring a civil action for appropriate relief, 476
including but not limited to a temporary restraining order or 477
permanent injunction in the court of common pleas of the county 478
where the unlicensed person resides or is acting as or claiming 479
to be a licensed contractor. 480
(C) A contractor licensed under this chapter may install, 481
service, and maintain the related or interfaced control wiring 482
for equipment and devices related to their specific license, on 483
the condition that the control wiring is less than twenty-five 484
volts. 485

S. B. No. 125 Page 18
As Introduced
(D) A person is not an electrical contractor subject to 486
licensure under this chapter for work that is limited to the 487
construction, improvement, renovation, repair, testing, or 488
maintenance of the following systems using less than fifty volts 489
of electricity: fire alarm or burglar alarm, cabling, tele-data 490
sound, communication, and landscape lighting and irrigation. 491
(E) A person may act as or claim to be a roofing 492
contractor without holding or being assigned a roofing 493
contractor's license issued pursuant to this chapter on a 494
construction project for which the installation, repair, 495
maintenance, or alteration of the roofing system is fairly 496
estimated to cost less than twenty thousand dollars. No person 497
shall subdivide a construction project into component parts so 498
that the cost of the roofing system is fairly estimated to be 499
less than twenty thousand dollars unless the project's component 500
parts are conceptually separate and unrelated to each other or 501
encompass independent and unrelated needs. 502
Sec. 4764.03. Section 4764.02 of the Revised Code does not 503
apply to any person described as follows if the person is acting 504
within the scope of practice of the person's respective 505
profession: 506
(A) A person who is employed by or whose services 507
otherwise are retained by this state or a political subdivision 508
of this state for the purpose of enforcing building codes; 509
(B) A person holding a valid certificate to practice 510
architecture issued under Chapter 4703. of the Revised Code; 511
(C) A person registered as a professional engineer under 512
Chapter 4733. of the Revised Code; 513
(D) A heating, ventilating, and air conditioning 514

S. B. No. 125 Page 19
As Introduced
contractor, refrigeration contractor, electrical contractor, 515
plumbing contractor, or hydronics contractor, or roofing 516
contractor who is licensed under Chapter 4740. or section 517
3781.102 of the Revised Code or who is licensed or registered 518
under section 715.27 of the Revised Code; 519
(E) A real estate broker, real estate salesperson, foreign 520
real estate dealer, or foreign real estate salesperson who is 521
licensed under Chapter 4735. of the Revised Code; 522
(F) A real estate appraiser who is licensed under Chapter 523
4763. of the Revised Code; 524
(G) A public insurance adjuster who holds a valid 525
certificate of authority issued under Chapter 3951. of the 526
Revised Code or an employee or representative of an insurer 527
licensed to transact business in this state under Title XXXIX of 528
the Revised Code who conducts an inspection of any property or 529
structure for purposes related to the business of insurance; 530
(H) A commercial applicator of pesticide who is licensed 531
under Chapter 921. of the Revised Code. 532
Section 2. That existing sections 715.27, 3781.102, 533
4740.01, 4740.02, 4740.04, 4740.12, 4740.13, and 4764.03 of the 534
Revised Code are hereby repealed. 535
Section 3. (A) On or before one hundred twenty days after 536
the effective date of this section, the Ohio Construction 537
Industry Licensing Board shall send notice by regular mail to 538
the legislative authority of a municipal corporation and to the 539
board of county commissioners of every county that, prior to the 540
effective date of this section, provided for the licensing or 541
registration of roofing contractors, informing the municipal 542
corporation and board of county commissioners of the provisions 543

S. B. No. 125 Page 20
As Introduced
of this act. 544
(B) Within ninety days after the effective date of this 545
section, the Ohio Construction Industry Licensing Board shall 546
publish notice of the provisions of this act in appropriate 547
trade publications and in a newspaper of general circulation in 548
each of the nine most populous metropolitan areas of this state, 549
once a week for three consecutive weeks. 550
Section 4. (A) The roofing section of the Ohio 551
Construction Industry Licensing Board shall issue a roofing 552
license, to any individual who meets the criteria described in 553
division (B) of this section. 554
(B) The individual does all of the following: 555
(1) Has been actively engaged as a roofing contractor in 556
this state for at least three years immediately prior to the 557
effective date of this section; 558
(2) Applies to the roofing section of the Board within 559
twelve months after the effective date of this section; 560
(3) Pays the appropriate fee determined by the roofing 561
section of the Board; 562
(4) Furnishes business records or other evidence to verify 563
the experience required under division (B)(1) of this section; 564
(5) Provides evidence of all of the following: 565
(a) Current contractor's liability insurance including, 566
without limitation, complete operations coverage in the amount 567
of five hundred thousand dollars; 568
(b) Compliance with Chapters 4121. and 4123. of the 569
Revised Code; 570

S. B. No. 125 Page 21
As Introduced
(c) Compliance with any other applicable legal 571
requirements to do business in this state, as determined by the 572
Board. 573
(C) Notwithstanding division (B)(5)(a) of this section, 574
when more than one individual affiliated with a contracting 575
company is issued a license pursuant to division (B) of this 576
section, those individuals collectively shall provide to the 577
appropriate section of the Board evidence of current 578
contractor's liability coverage, including complete operations 579
coverage, in the total amount of five hundred thousand dollars. 580